District of Columbia statutes.
5-127.02

Affirmations and oaths to depositions.

The Mayor and the Chief of Police have power to administer, take, receive, and subscribe all affirmations and oaths to any depositions necessary by the rules and regulations of the Mayor, relating to the Metropolitan Police.

History

R.S., D.C., § 392
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 6
June 8, 1906, 34 Stat. 221, ch. 3056

Cross References

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see 1-632.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-119.
1973 Ed., § 4-123.

Editor's Notes

Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.